Mississippi, session 2026, HB1085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi National Guard Servicemembers Medical Readiness Act". SECTION 2.  (1)  There is hereby established within the Mississippi Military Department the "Mississippi National Guard Tricare Premium Reimbursement Program" (hereinafter referred to as "program"). The Mississippi Military Department may award reimbursement grants under the program to an eligible recipient who meets the reimbursement application requirements established by the department for (a) reimbursement of premiums paid for individual coverage for an eligible recipient through the TRICARE reserve select program and/or (b) reimbursement of premiums paid for individual coverage for an eligible recipient through the TRICARE dental program.  If any portion of the premiums eligible for reimbursement under the program is paid for, reimbursed, or otherwise provided to an eligible recipient by the federal government, then that portion shall cease to be eligible for reimbursement under the program. (b) For the purposes of this section, the term "eligible recipient" means an individual who is: (i) A member of the Mississippi National Guard; (ii) Eligible for TRICARE reserve select coverage and/or TRICARE dental program coverage; and (iii) Not receiving health insurance coverage or dental insurance coverage, as applicable, through a civilian employer. (2) The Mississippi Military Department shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program and shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary for its implementation, including procedures for application, verification of eligibility, disbursement of funds and tracking of program impact on readiness.     (3)  The funds for the program shall be subject to annual appropriation by the Legislature. (4) The Adjutant General of Mississippi shall provide an annual report to the Legislature on the effectiveness of the program, including the number of participants, the impact on medical readiness and any recommendations for improvements to the program. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.